Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-7,103
Livestock certification program; department; powers.

The department may establish procedures to implement sections 54-797 to 54-7,103.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 16.

Definitions, where found, see section 54-2902.